Utah statutes.
4-17-4.5.   Commissioner may require county weed control board to justify failure to enforce provisions.

If the commissioner determines that the weed control board of any county has failed to perform its duties under this chapter, the commissioner may require the board to justify, in writing, its failure to enforce these provisions within its county.

